Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.115

Sexually violent predator escape.

(1) A person is guilty of sexually violent predator escape if:

(a) Having been found to be a sexually violent predator and confined to the special commitment center or another secure facility under court order, the person escapes from the secure facility;

(b) Having been found to be a sexually violent predator and being under an order of conditional release, the person leaves or remains absent from the state of Washington without prior court authorization; or

(c) Having been found to be a sexually violent predator and being under an order of conditional release, the person: (i) Without authorization, leaves or remains absent from his or her residence, place of employment, educational institution, or authorized outing; (ii) tampers with his or her electronic monitoring device or removes it without authorization; or (iii) escapes from his or her escort.

(2) Sexually violent predator escape is a class A felony with a minimum sentence of sixty months, and shall be sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507.

[ 2009 c 28 s 32; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 360; 2001 c 287 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—2001 c 287: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2001] except for section 4 of this act, which takes effect July 1, 2001." [ 2001 c 287 s 5.]